District of Columbia statutes.
2-357.03

Bond forms and copies.

(a)

The CPO shall prescribe the form of the bonds required by this chapter.

(b)

Any person may request and obtain from the District a certified copy of a bond upon payment of the cost of reproduction of the bond and postage, if any. A certified copy of a bond shall be prima facie evidence of the contents, execution, and delivery of the original.

Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 703, 58 DCR 1185